Utah statutes.
79-2-205.   Procedures -- Adjudicative proceedings.
Except as provided by Sections 40-10-13, 63G-4-102, and 73-2-25, a division,
board, council, or committee referred to in Section 79-2-201 shall comply with
the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative
Procedures Act, in an adjudicative proceeding.
